Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1653.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article VII of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a subarticle to read:(f) Child-Care Center Assistance GrantsSection 775. Rural child care creation grants.(a) Establishment of grant.--The department shall establish a competitive grant for nonprofit early childhood education organizations and public school districts to offer child care in rural counties. The department shall require that a child-care center that applies for a grant under this section comply with licensing requirements in this article.1234567891011121314151617 (b) Awarding of grants.--A grant may be awarded to new child-care centers in counties with a population density under 291 people per square mile that expand or establish child care beyond the organization or school district's current offering. The county must also be considered lacking child care openings as determined by the department in consultation with the Center for Rural Pennsylvania.(c) Uses of grant money.--Grant money may be used by the recipient for:(1) Land purchase cost.(2) Facility construction.(3) Facility renovation.(4) Two years of staff salary supplements according to the following:(i) Staff salary supplements for school districts that establish a new child-care center would be the amount necessary to provide salary parity across early childhood education.(ii) Certified prekindergarten teachers may not be paid less than the district's starting salary for other teachers with prekindergarten to fourth grade instructional certifications at the same step.(iii) Child development associates, as credentialed by the Council for Professional Recognition, may not be paid less than the local school district's starting salary for kindergarten through fourth grade teachers with no experience.(d) Match of grant requirement.--A grant applicant under this section must show at least one partnership with a local business that agrees to pay a portion of the child-care fees for 20250HB1653PN2006 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the business's employees attending the child-care center. These agreements are solely at the discretion of the child-care center and the local business, for the purpose of maintaining child-care staff salary levels after the two-year grant supplement ends.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Local business." A business located within the same county as the child-care center or a geographically adjoining county to the county that the child-care center is located.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1653PN2006 - 3 - 123456789101112